International Information Programs East Asia-Pacific Security Issues U.S. Policy Toward North Korea
What U.S. Administration Officials Are Saying* June 2003 Excerpts from statements made by U.S. Administration officials about North Korea
June 30, 2003 U.S. Ambassador to Japan Howard H. Baker, Jr.
Speech followed by Q
AMBASSADOR BAKER: Ladies and Gentlemen, I must make one point clear.
From time to time I've had an opportunity to speak officially, privately, and on occasion publicly, about my concern for the danger represented by North Korea and their nuclear ambition.
Let me say now that America does not, nor do I, have any animosity toward the people of North Korea.
It is not a question of hostility toward the people of North Korea, but rather, I guess, the threat that their government represents to peace and stability in this region, this part of the world, and to other parts of the world.
So I would like to make it very clear that when I speak, perhaps in stern tones, about North Korea, it does not mean that I have any hostile feelings toward the people of North Korea.
But rather that I call on the government of North Korea to abandon its nuclear ambition.
I think as the leaders of South Korea, Japan, and the United States have made abundantly clear, the possession of nuclear weapons by North Korea represents a real threat, and we must express, as we have expressed, our determination that the Korean Peninsula will not be nuclearized.
How that is accomplished is very much a matter that we must address in the future, and Japan and the United States, and South Korea, and perhaps China and maybe Russia, will be fully involved in our consultation and coordination in the approach that ultimately will lead to a settlement.
The next steps are not difficult.
Our President and the Prime Minister and the President of South Korea have made it clear that the next meeting should be a multi-party meeting involving Japan, this time, and South Korea, as well, in addition to China, the United States, and North Korea.
The reason for that is the threat is multinational.
It is not really so much a threat against the United States as it is a threat against South Korea and Japan, and perhaps China and Russia.
So negotiations should be undertaken on a multi-party basis.
That's the first step.
It would be very easy, it seems to me, for North Korea to agree to that.
It is not an onerous burden.
The second thing is that North Korea must agree to forgo its nuclear ambition and to dismantle, in a verifiable and irreversible way, its drive toward nuclear weapons.
That will be more difficult, perhaps, for the North Koreans, but it is absolutely essential, because otherwise our negotiations will be meaningless.
We should be determined, and determined together, to see that the nuclear threat on the Korean Peninsula is eliminated.
It's fully within the power of the North Korean Government to do that in one simple move, and that is to agree and acquiesce to those conditions.
If they do so, it is my guess that the world community, including the United States, and I feel sure Japan and South Korea, would react in a most favorable way in terms of humanitarian relief for the people of North Korea, in terms of the redevelopment of that impoverished country, in terms of the other things that can alleviate the pain and suffering.
It is not difficult to imagine that those things can follow on swiftly after North Korea changes its policy.
And finally, as we discussed just a moment ago, North Korea must successfully address the question of abductees.
Not only for Japan, but indeed for the sensibilities of the entire world, because it is a universal assault on the dignity of mankind that North Korea would be permitted to abduct private citizens, to hold them against their will, and in many cases, to fail to disclose where they are, or their condition.
But those are not impossible conditions for North Korea.
So I would hope that the government of North Korea would take heed of the need to do that, the ease with which it could be done, and proceed promptly to undertake it, so that the world can be delivered from the threat of nuclear weapons on the Korean Peninsula, and so we can join together in alleviating the suffering and distress of the people of that impoverished land.
June 30, 2003 State Department Spokesman Richard Boucher Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: Richard, Representative Weldon has put forward some ideas on ending North Korea's nuclear weapons programs publicly in the Philadelphia Enquirer today.
Do you think -- I'm happy to summarize them, although I suspect you've already had a chance to find out what they are -- do you think that they have any merit, and particularly his idea of giving North Korea $3-5 billion a year for the next ten years?
MR. BOUCHER: I think at this point the Administration is considering where -- how we want to proceed vis-�-vis North Korea.
So I don't think I am in a position to start commenting on specific ideas as being in the ballpark or not in the ballpark or anything like that.
We are consulting closely with the Japanese and the South Koreans, both through the formal meetings and through other kinds of informal discussions such as those we would expect to have with some of their officials this week in Washington.
We have also been in close contact, as you know, with the Chinese and the Russians and others, so we are, at this point, considering what we should do next.
We have made very, very clear our position.
We are not going to pay to get the North Koreans not to do something that they shouldn't have been doing to begin with.
We expect the North Koreans to verifiably and irreversibly dismantle their nuclear programs.
We and many others around the world, including just about everybody who spoke out at the recent ASEAN Regional Forum meeting, have made clear that we seek a denuclearized Peninsula, we seek to have the North implement the agreements that it agreed to many years ago with various parties.
As for Congressman Weldon, I would point out that he has briefed Department officials on his discussions in North Korea, including his ideas about how it might be resolved.
He came in to see Secretary Powell with some of his colleagues; I think it was June 12th.
As we have indicated, at the time of his travel, his travel was in the capacity of a Member of the House of Representatives.
He wasn't acting on behalf of the Administration during that trip, but he was kind enough to come afterwards and tell us what he saw and about his conversations and what his views were.
We have been seeking a peaceful and diplomatic resolution of the situation there.
We have indicated our willingness to engage in multilateral talks, including North Korea, to address the concerns that we and others in the international community share.
And as I said, the consultations are ongoing with other governments about what the next steps might be.
QUESTION: One thing.
The first of these ten proposals was signing a non-aggression pact.
Is that something that the Administration has any interest in doing with North Korea?
MR. BOUCHER: Again, I am not in a position to start talking about specific ideas as possible or not possible.
We have to have a chance to consider the whole universe of possibilities and decide what the Administration wants to do in terms of next steps, along with our allies as we consult very closely with them as we go forward.
QUESTION: Have you fixed up a trilateral meeting with these visitors this week yet?
MR. BOUCHER: We have ongoing consultations.
Frankly, I don't know if we will meet in a three-party configuration.
It is not the formal Trilateral meeting, but trilateral with a small "t" I just don't know.
QUESTION: And have -- what exactly is your objective from these consultations? Are you hoping by the end of this week to have a kind of plan of action that --
MR. BOUCHER: A roadmap? (Laughter.)
QUESTION: Exactly.
A roadmap.
MR. BOUCHER: No.
Our goal is to continue the close consultations we have had with our friends and allies in this process, and when we have something to announce about next steps I am sure we will announce it.
QUESTION: Have you had any meetings with the North Koreans through the Special Envoy?
MR. BOUCHER: They keep in touch from time to time through the New York channel.
That's the only thing that might have occurred....
QUESTION: Let's go back to Pyongyang.
And there is an article, Japanese media -- Japanese media that it seemed like there is a different stance between the State Department and the Department of Defense in dealing with North Korea.
It talked about there is -- because the State Department is talking about multilateral talks including -- involving Japan and South Korea.
But the Department of Defense is pushing the early agreement on the Presidential statement from the United Nations.
And I just want to know do you have any comments on that?
MR. BOUCHER: I didn't see the particular article.
It doesn't sound like it makes a whole lot of sense, but I will leave that to the author.
I hope it is not you.
The policy of this Administration vis-�-vis North Korea is the policy that the President has set, that the President has enunciated, and that is to pursue multilateral talks with North Korea, to try to solve the issues of North Korea's nuclear developments peacefully and diplomatically, but to do so with a verifiable and irreversible change in their nuclear weapons programs.
As far as pursuing this at the United Nations, the U.S. Government has been talking with other countries up there.
Our representative, the President's representative at the UN, has been discussing this with other nations about what the next step should be.
We all worked to get the referral from the IAEA to the UN to the UN Security Council.
We are now in touch with other nations up there about how to proceed.
QUESTION: Thank you.
In the informal meeting with Japan and South Korea this week, is there any possibility they are going to discuss about the stopping of the construction of light water reactor in North Korea?
And I know you might say that you cannot speculate for the future talks, but what's the standpoint of the U.S. Government about this issue?
QUESTION: I mean, first of all, the status, what to do about the light water reactor is also a matter -- is a matter for the KEDO Board of Directors, and so it involves other countries, in addition to the United States, Japan and South Korea.
It is an issue that needs to be discussed.
It is frequently discussed between the three countries, or any of us when we get together bilaterally.
So I wouldn't be surprised if we discussed it this week.
But it is, in terms of decision-making, it is a matter that the Board has to decide.
QUESTION: Do you have any more on the informal meeting this week about the --
MR. BOUCHER: Yes.
QUESTION: Is there any possibility that the kind of roadmap or, you know, counterproposal toward North Korea will be discussed? I don't want to --
MR. BOUCHER: I don't want to -- I don't think I'd speculate too much in that direction.
We are at a moment when it is important to us to discuss with our friends how this situation should evolve and what the next steps might be, what we want to see out of the diplomatic and peaceful course that we have been following.
So I am sure sort of what -- how do we forward with this is going to be discussed, but I don't want to make it, sort of pretend that there is something like a roadmap or that that necessarily has to be discussed at this juncture.
June 27, 2003 State Department Spokesman Richard Boucher Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: Could you give us some details on talks the Secretary had with the Minister of National Defense of South Korea this morning?
MR. BOUCHER: South Korea? The Secretary met with the South Korean Defense Minister Cho today to discuss our alliance as well as the current situation regarding North Korea.
They talked about half an hour.
The Defense Minister will be in Washington until June 28th.
He has also got meetings scheduled with the Vice President, with Secretary Rumsfeld and other U.S. officials.
In the meeting today, the Secretary made clear our commitment to the alliance with the Republic of Korea and to continuing to work with the Republic of Korea to strengthen that alliance.
They discussed the realignment of U.S. Forces Korea, looking at how to do -- agreeing that this would strengthen deterrence on the peninsula, and therefore help enhance stability in the East Asia region as well as adjust our presence in light of new realities.
They also discussed the situation with respect to North Korea.
Both sides agree on the need for a verifiable and irreversible elimination of the North Korean nuclear programs, and both sides look to seek a diplomatic and peaceful resolution to the problem.
QUESTION: Do you have and specifics on what they talked about about the realignment and how many --
MR. BOUCHER: I think the specifics have come out of the U.S. and Korean forces on the peninsula, and so I would leave it to that, but it's, I think, something that both nations want to do.
We want to make sure that our defense posture is updated.
We think it can strengthen our capabilities, strengthen our abilities, as well as ease some of the difficulties that occur in the current footprint that we have.
We'll support it as appropriate and the Koreans will support it as appropriate, too, to carry it through....
QUESTION: Back to North Korea.
Have you set the next TCOG meeting possibly next week?
MR. BOUCHER: No.
Not -- there is not a formal TCOG meeting set, at this point.
We do have Japanese and South Korean officials coming next week for consultations, more informal consultations.
QUESTION: Okay, and one more.
It's about light water reactor construction by KEDO.
Does the Secretary share the view with Ambassador Baker in Tokyo, who said yesterday that it's unlikely that construction to be completed if the North Korean doesn't dismantle the nuclear programs?
MR. BOUCHER: I don't see anything wrong with that, that kind of makes sense.
But there is no final decision.
There is no formal decision at this point.
QUESTION: Is there some difference of opinion on this between Washington and Seoul and Tokyo?
MR. BOUCHER: This is an issue of discussion.
It's an issue of consultation.
We have worked this matter very closely with them in a very close alignment.
But when we have a decision, we'll announce one.
QUESTION: Do you have anything new to report on the follow-up on the three-way talks in Beijing, do you? The U.S.-China-North Korea talks?
MR. BOUCHER: Nothing new to announce on that, no.
June 26, 2003 Admiral Thomas B. Fargo U.S. Navy Commander, U.S. Pacific Command Statement to the House International Relations Committee Subcommittee on Asia and the Pacific
The events of 2002 remind us of the dangers posed by the Kim Jong-Il regime and the threat our ROK-U.S. combined team faces on the peninsula.
The conventional threat from the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK) remains unabated, illustrated by the unprovoked naval attack on 29 June 2002 on an ROK Navy vessel that resulted in the loss of five young ROK sailors.
The DPRK maintains more than 60 percent of its forces within 100 kilometers of the Demilitarized Zone (DMZ), and the Kim regime persists in its "military first" policy, providing sufficient resources to keep its large force fed, equipped, and exercised, while its citizens face deprivation and starvation.
The DPRK has so far not broken its self-imposed moratorium on conducting ballistic missile test flights, it continues development efforts including static engine tests.
Additionally, the DPRK exports missiles and missile technology, posing a grave counter-proliferation concern.
Finally, the Kim regime continues to engage in nuclear brinkmanship, with the disclosure of its Highly Enriched Uranium program and recent announcement on the resumption of their plutonium production and reprocessing programs.
These actions are in violation of the 1994 Agreed Framework, DPRK pledges to the IAEA, and the 1992 North-South Basic Agreement calling for denuclearization of the Peninsula.
The DPRK is not above precipitating a crisis to strengthen its bargaining position.
Now more than ever it is critical our ROK-U.S. partnership stand firm.
The Korean people are looking for ways to foster reconciliation with the DPRK.
We recognize the importance of these efforts to the Korean people and their government.
Moreover, we agree on the crucial role of the Armistice Agreement in maintaining peace on the Korean Peninsula, and we are committed to ensuring that efforts at reconciliation do not increase risk for the security of the ROK or the United States.
June 26, 2003 State Department Spokesman Richard Boucher Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: Would you update us light water reactor construction in North Korea by KEDO? And is it still in progress or freezed or --
MR. BOUCHER: The bottom line on this is no decisions have been made yet, but we are certainly in touch with other executive board member countries; that is, Japan, South Korea, and the European Union.
We're consulting closely on the future of the light water reactor project with them, but it's informal consultations at this point.
We have also discussed this with our partners, Japan and South Korea, at the Trilateral Coordination Oversight Group.
But, at this point, there has been no decision.
QUESTION: You said an informal meeting at TCOG.
Have you decided a next meeting in Washington?
MR. BOUCHER: I don't have a date for the next meeting of the Trilateral Group yet.
It may be decided, but I don't have it.
June 23, 2003 State Department Deputy Spokesman Philip Reeker Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: Yes.
Can you clarify one thing? Last Friday you talked about a possible presidential statement the U.S. is working on with the other permanent members --
MR. REEKER: Are we talking about North Korea at the United Nations?
QUESTION: Yes.
Is that -- the presidential statement representing the five countries or representing the United States issues?
MR. REEKER: No.
Let's go back over what that is.
We have looked for the UN Security Council to take steps to demonstrate the international community's concern with the nuclear weapons program that is being pursued by North Korea.
We have talked about this for some time, since the IAEA referred the matter to the Security Council -- I believe, in February, was it? One of the things, one of the possible ways forward we have looked at, is a presidential statement.
That is a format that where the UN Security Council, through its presidency -- as you know, has a rotating presidency -- can make a statement that expresses the views of the Security Council on behalf of the international community.
We have circulated with the permanent five members and shared with other members of the United Nations, other concerned countries like Japan and South Korea, a possible draft of a text of a possible statement.
There is nothing formal in that sense yet, but we have had discussions with a variety of countries on that.
And I don't have anything new to add at this point, but that is how that process would work and that is what we shared, as we talked about last week, with the four other permanent members of the Security Council, as well as some other countries.
And we will just see where that goes in the future.
Our concern remains that we need to have denuclearized Korean Peninsula and that North Korea should get itself out of the problem it put itself into by verifiably dismantling its nuclear weapons program.
QUESTION: Do you have any specific schedule for five-party talks of North Korea nuclear stuff?
MR. REEKER: No.
I don't have anything new on North Korea or potential talks.
We continue to see this as a multilateral issue, that is, the President and Secretary Powell have made clear we want to resolve through a peaceful, diplomatic process.
As you recall, we had three-way talks with North Korea and China held in Beijing and we have always been quite clear that we would want to see South Korea and Japan join such a multilateral format because this is a multilateral problem.
It is a problem that affects South Korea obviously, Japan obviously, as well as China and other countries like Russia, Australia.
Countries all around the world have an interest in this, and that ties in closely to why the international community, through the IAEA or even the Security Council, have been looking at this and trying to find a way forward to define the diplomatic resolution to this problem.
June 20, 2003 Deputy Secretary of State Richard Armitage Remarks After Addressing the World Refugee Day Commemoration Outside the National Geographic Society Washington, DC June 20, 2003
QUESTION: Are you expecting a multilateral talk with North Korea, including Japan and North Korea, in a few months?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: That will be up to the North Koreans.
We've made it very clear, Secretary Powell did in Cambodia, that we want to have multilateral talks, including expanding the talks to have Tokyo and Seoul.
But we haven't had an answer back from the North Koreans yet.
QUESTION: Sir, Secretary Wolfowitz said if North Korea attack Japan and South Korea, will face devastating military strike from Americans.
Is he trying to warn the North Koreans?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: No.
It's a fact of life that any attack on Japan would be considered by the United States also an attack on the United States.
And that's the nature of our security alliance.
It means no further than that.
June 20, 2003 State Department Deputy Spokesman Philip Reeker Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: On North Korea.
A Japanese newspaper reported that Washington told Tokyo that North Korea has several small-scale nuclear warheads for ballistic missiles.
Have you heard of such reports and do you have any comment on them?
MR. REEKER: I have seen a variety of press reports on that.
As you know, it is not our practice to comment or speculate on reports that involve intelligence-related matters.
But what I can say, which should be of no news to you, is that we have stated publicly on many occasions that we believe North Korea may have one, possibly two, nuclear weapons.
Secretary Powell made that point in his press conference in Phnom Penh, Cambodia, just two days ago, on Wednesday.
Once again, I think we are all quite aware that North Korea is also actively pursuing a nuclear weapons program that we have insisted must be verifiably and irreversibly ended.
And I think it is a fact that is well established that North Korea has flight-tested medium-range missiles.
So the facts and the statements that have been made in the past remain the salient facts here....
QUESTION: On the issue of North Korea, I'm wondering if you have ever formally or informally contacted Japan on that regard?
MR. REEKER: We talk to Japan constantly on the issue of North Korea.
I think you are quite aware of that.
We have meetings at a variety of levels, including the regular Trilateral Coordination Group meetings with Japan and South Korea, the most recently one held last week in Honolulu, and you saw the statement from that.
We are in regular consultation with Japan, with South Korea, with China and other governments about the situation with North Korea.
We have made quite clear, as Secretary Powell did again in Cambodia this week, and many others in the international community made clear, that we want to seek a peaceful and a diplomatic solution to this, that North Korea can get itself out of the situation it has put itself into by verifiably and irreversibly ending its nuclear weapons program....
QUESTION: On North Korea.
After the -- you brought the case to the UN Security permanent members yesterday, what do you expect next? What do you want the members to do?
MR. REEKER: Well, this is the situation with North Korea, as we were just discussing, and as the Secretary noted this week, there is no issue of greater urgency to the United States, and a consistent view among nations at the ASEAN meetings, regional foreign meetings in Phnom Penh, that nuclear weapons on the Korean Peninsula cannot be tolerated.
As you know, the Security Council, that is, the United Nations Security Council, has been considering the issue.
Since the International Atomic Energy Agency reported the matter to the Council in February, we have been continuing to have discussions with other Council members.
We have been exploring the possibility of a presidential statement, as a means to convey authoritatively and unequivocally, the international community's concern to Pyongyang.
We do continue to believe that a strong public statement from the Council would strengthen our diplomatic efforts to reach a peaceful solution, and would complement efforts by countries in the region aimed at multilateral talks with North Korea.
So we have continued to have those types of discussions with the permanent five members of the Security Council, and, of course, with South Korea and Japan, as I mentioned earlier.
QUESTION: But right now, no other actions?
MR. REEKER: That is exactly what we are looking at.
I think many members of the Security Council would agree on the importance of speaking clearly on this issue, and we are discussing the timing and modalities for doing so.
Our view remains that North Korea must visibly and irreversibly, verifiably dismantle their nuclear weapons program.
And we have begun to circulate a draft text as part of the discussions that we have been having.
We have shared these ideas with other concerned governments in New York, but I couldn't speculate on any timing or any further meetings at this point.
QUESTION: And the draft text on this is on --
MR. REEKER: We have begun --
QUESTION: -- North Korea's nuclear program?
MR. REEKER: Right.
What we were looking at in our discussions with other Security Council members was exploring the possibility of a presidential statement, as a means to convey our concerns to Pyongyang as part of our multilateral diplomacy.
And that is part of the discussions that we have been having with the permanent five members of the Security Council, as well as other countries.
QUESTION: Okay.
But you say there is no timing decided on --
MR. REEKER: No, I couldn't speculate on timing.
June 19, 2003 Secretary of State Colin Powell Press Briefing En Route The Dead Sea, Jordan On board plane
QUESTION: Mr. Secretary, can you tell us about your encounter yesterday with a North Korean diplomat? We understand now that they are talking about bilateral talks as a prelude to multilateral and maybe they are moving in that direction if you have that sense.
And also, if the IAEA statement on Iran is out, can you talk about it?
SECRETARY POWELL: I just havent seen the statement yet, it hasnt come up to me, so I cant.
With respect to the North Korean Ambassador, it was at the tail end of the ministers lunch and he was representing his country.
It was a fairly modest size dining room with about four large tables in it, as various people were breaking up and heading to the doors.
He was just finishing a meeting with Foreign Minister Kawaguchi.
And we met by the door, shook hands, and just exchanged views for about what must have been no more than three minutes.
I reinforced the points I had made in the open session, that it had to be a multilateral forum, but that the United States and everybody else at the conference wanted to do whatever we could to help the North Korean people but it had to begin with the end of their nuclear weapons program and it was in their interest to get moving in that direction.
And since it was an issue that affected all parties in the region, a multilateral forum was the best.
And he expressed their desire, of course, to talk directly to us and I said that we are committed to a multilateral forum, and as I said in my intervention yesterday, once youre in that multilateral forum, you can speak to whoever you wish who is at the table.
That was pretty much it.
It was nothing that was earthshaking or groundbreaking an exchange of views but giving to him privately what I have been giving publicly, or in the open session.
June 18, 2003 White House Spokesman Ari Fleischer White House Briefing
Q Thank you.
North Korea today says it will increase its nuclear deterrent capabilities in response to what it calls U.S. pressure.
What's your reaction to that? And do you have a list of the countries North Korea is selling drugs and nuclear weapons to?
MR. FLEISCHER: On your first question, what's important is for North Korea to understand that the international community is unified in its approach to North Korea not developing nuclear weapons.
It remains a deep source of concern for China, for Russia, for Japan, for South Korea, and for the United States.
And this is a message that has been conveyed directly and repeatedly to the North Koreans.
I think their understanding that their actions, where previously they were rewarded for their belligerent and bad behavior, will not be repeated this time.
North Korea has a rather dramatic history of engaging in rhetorical excesses.
And I think that continues now....
Q Also on North Korea, are we any closer to another round of actual talks with the North Koreans?
MR. FLEISCHER: We're continuing to consult with our allies about the modalities for it, what the next step will be.
So that remains to be determined.
June 18, 2003 Secretary of State Colin Powell Press Briefing in Phnom Penh, Cambodia At the ASEAN Regional Forum
Secretary Powell: In our meetings today we also discussed the situation on the Korean peninsula.
ARF members made it abundantly clear that we all need to work together to see a nuclear weapons-free Korean peninsula.
ASEANs help in keeping pressure on North Korea is absolutely necessary to achieve a diplomatic solution that leaves the peninsula, the region, and the world safer....
QUESTION: Tom Intire with CNN.
Youve apparently spent a great deal of time talking to the ARF about North Korea.
At about the same time North Korea, through its statement to the media, admitted for the first time that they do possess nuclear weapons but continue to push the line that multi-party talks theyre not interested in, only with the United States.
You call on ASEAN to continue to put pressure to maintain a nuclear-free Korean peninsula.
Did you get any assurances back from ASEAN in you request?
SECRETARY POWELL: You say today they announced for the first time? Theyve been saying it quite frequently and they even said to us that they told us ten years ago that they had nuclear weapons but we didnt hear them correctly at that time.
So they have been making this claim for some time, and for some time we have said that we attribute that capability to them, that they might have one or two nuclear weapons.
We know that they had reprocessed enough material for that and that they probably also had the wherewithal to build such weapons, so we attributed that capability to them.
There was a consistent view in the discussion today, every nation talked to this, that we cannot tolerate in Asia nuclear weapons in the Korean peninsula.
There was a consistent view that North Korea therefore had to find a way to abandon its program.
And there was a consistent view that it affected North Koreas neighbors just as much as it attracted US interest and, therefore, should be dealt with in a multilateral way.
I enforced the US position that we believe that all of North Koreas neighbors have an interest in this.
It is not a US-North Korea issue alone, and we must not let North Korea try to isolate itself from the wishes and will and the equities of its own neighbors.
And there was strong support for that position as well.
I think if you look at the Chairmans statement you will see that reflected.
June 17, 2003 Secretary of State Colin Powell On board plane en route to Phnom Penh for The ASEAN Regional Forum
QUESTION: Could you give us a more specific sense of what you plan to say...about North Korea?
SECRETARY POWELL: ...
And on North Korea, I don't know who'll be there for North Korea -- I don't think it'll be the Foreign Minister - but, the North Koreans will be in the room when I will once again make the case that they have to stop this nuclear weapon development program that they have underway and the way to do it is through multilateral dialogue.
The President is still confident that we can achieve a political and diplomatic solution, and I'm pleased at the unity we've been able to achieve with the countries in the region.
Everybody is saying the same thing to the North Koreans with the respect to the unacceptability of their actions, that they want a Korean Peninsula without nuclear weapons, and frankly nobody is doing much in the way of providing help to the North Koreans right now, and it's sort of tragic when you think of where we were, say 14-15 months ago, when there was a movement -- the Japanese were moving through a process of providing aid and normalization -- others were anxious to do things, and then we learned about the enriched uranium program and it came to a halt.
There is a way forward, and we're going to make sure that the North Koreans understand what that way forward is, and make the point that we will not be intimidated by their rhetoric or their actions.
QUESTION: Following up on North Korea, can you tell us what you think the IAEA will do this week, and how does the, on North -- oh, I'm sorry, I've got it mixed up - on North Korea, I want you to connect it to the interdiction program, about which much has been written in the last week or so.
You mentioned piracy and other forms of maritime security, but isn't this also directed at North Korea's shipments, including to Japan?
SECRETARY POWELL: The specific statement that you'll see tomorrow won't, but as you look at what happens on the high seas with respect to piracy, with respect to trafficking in persons, with respect to drug running, with respect to the shipment of weapons of mass destruction, you can see that there could be a broader agenda for discussing maritime security.
There was another meeting in Madrid earlier this week or last week, where we started to move forward on the other initiative that we started, I guess two weeks ago, where we contacted a number of nations most interested in this, to see if we could not start coming up with approaches to the problem of interdicting weapons of mass destruction and making it more difficult for them to traverse the airways and seaways and landways of the world.
Whether these efforts will blend together at some point, it's too early to say, Steve.
QUESTION: Mr. Secretary, you were talking about countries that have aided North Korea, and you said you've seen a real swing toward cutting off aid to North Korea.
Does that include China, any more than that brief interruption in oil shipments?
SECRETARY POWELL: I think that China's still providing aid to North Korea and they haven't cut off, but I was really referring to was the momentum we saw last year, when there were all sorts of initiatives coming from the South.
One of them did come to pass the other day when they finished the rail line going through, put the final bolt in the rail line over the weekend, but otherwise there hasn't been much else going North, and the big initiative that has stopped was what Prime Minister Koizumi had indicated would be possible in the way of billions of dollars of assistance, and a path towards normalization, and then you had the return of the kidnapped ones to Japan, and that plus the North Korean nuclear developments essentially stopped that path for now.
The Japanese have been speaking as strongly as we have, frankly, in the recent weeks and months about the need of North Korea to do something about this.
But China, I can't say that they have cut off anything, or that they have added anything more to what they had traditionally been doing, I don't have that much insight into Chinese programs....
QUESTION: ...
Does it do any good for countries to change their attitudes about helping North Korea if China is still giving them oil and other forms of aid?
SECRETARY POWELL: I think it does, because North Korea, even with Chinese aid, is suffering mightily.
It is a country that is in great difficulty, live in a potemkin capital, but the countryside is in dire straits -- and that is with Chinese aid.
They need more than Chinese aid and Chinese fuel.
They need aid from other neighbors and they need aid from the rest of the world, and that's the message we convey to our friends and our partners in the region....
QUESTION: Alright, on North Korea.
It's been eight months since the discovery of the enrichment program, precious little has happened since then diplomatically.
There has been, you know, the brief meeting in October and you had the brief meeting in October, you had the meeting in China, is there anything new with respect to North Korean willingness to reach a diplomatic solution, which you say is possible?
SECRETARY POWELL: Since last October, when this all blew, I guess that's about eight months, we have convinced North Korea that multilateral is the way to go, although they are holding out at three and we believe it has to be more than three and we'll press that point.
I think we have aligned the international community in a way that makes it clear to North Korea that they will not have any support or friends helping them with this.
We got the IAEA to take a position, it is before the UN, and we will make judgments in the weeks ahead as to whether we want the UN to take any action, and North Koreans, what they have done is made a lot of statements and made a lot of claims and tossed out a lot of rhetoric and shifted their arguments and their latest argument was that they need nuclear weapons in order to cut the size of their conventional forces which was something I had never heard from them before, and to save money which is an interesting concept for North Koreans.
So, its been about, I guess, eight months, and these things take time, that's usually what's called diplomacy, and we'll keep working away at it.
I'm still hopeful of a diplomatic solution and I don't think we are in crisis mode.
It's a dangerous situation and we worried about it, we're working on it, working on it very hard, and we believe that we can find an answer.
June 17, 2003 State Department Spokesman Richard Boucher Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: KCNA, North Korea's KCNA News Agency, had said that if North Korea feels like Washington's infringing their sovereignty, they're going to react with an immediate retaliation.
Does the State Department have anything to say on that comment?
MR. REEKER: I saw this latest round of bellicose rhetoric.
I think as we have said before, threats from North Korea do not contribute to resolving the legitimate concerns of the international community about North Korea's actions.
North Korea has put itself in the position it is in now by taking a variety of actions with regard to nuclear weapons program.
And we seek a peaceful, diplomatic solution to the situation that North Korea has created through the pursuit of nuclear weapons.
That is the same position that we have had, and the international community, I think, stands very firm in support of a nuclear weapons free Korean Peninsula, and, of course, a peaceful and diplomatic solution to achieve it.
As President Bush has described, this will clearly be a subject that Secretary Powell will have an opportunity to discuss with others in the region, since he is now going to be meeting with Asian and other foreign ministers around the ASEAN Regional Forum meetings in Phnom Penh.
Certainly, as you know, we have been working closely with Japan and South Korea.
We had our Trilateral Coordination Group meeting last week, I would
refer you to the statement from that meeting, where we agreed on coordination and agreed that we are concerned about North Korea's programs and also their illegal activities that are carried out by North Korean entities like drug running, counterfeiting
.
So we have certainly continued to discuss means of cooperating with South Korea, with Japan, and kept in very close touch with other countries like China, Russia, Australia, and the Secretary will have an opportunity to do that in his meetings tomorrow....
QUESTION: I just to make sure, ask you if you have new about the possible nuclear talks on North Korea.
A South Korean officer said that Beijing would welcome like five-way talks including Japan, North Korea, South Korea, U.S.
MR. REEKER: That has certainly been our position.
I don't have anything to move it along or to announce talks.
I did suggest, as the Secretary himself has, that he will have North Korea on his agenda for his various meetings, both the larger meetings and individual meetings that he'll have in Phnom Penh at or around the sidelines of the ASEAN Regional Forum and the post-ministerial conference he is attending right now.
June 16, 2003 State Department Deputy Spokesman Philip T. Reeker Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: Have you heard anything about reports out of Seoul that there have been container -- that there are containers headed for Iran from North Korea shipping missiles?
MR. BOUCHER: I guess I've heard some -- I've seen those reports.
I don't think we have any information that I can share with you on that.
We have certainly taken seriously Iran's -- North Korea's missile programs and its exports.
We work closely with other countries who are likeminded in this.
We have expressed concern also to other governments about their military cooperation with North Korea, and we think that everybody should refrain from missile cooperation with North Korea.
But, at this point, beyond saying that it's well known that they produce and export missiles, I don't think there's anything specific that I could say about those reports.
June 13, 2003 Joint Statement of the Trilateral Coordination and Oversight Group Honolulu, Hawaii
Full text.
June 12, 2003 State Department Spokesman Richard Boucher Daily Press Briefing
QUESTION: ...
The Secretary made a rather cryptic reference this morning a bit of a mixed metaphor, he said that finding a way for the North Koreans to get out of the box.
I wonder if you could elaborate? ....
MR. BOUCHER: Thats not a mixed metaphor.
But anyway, keep going.
QUESTION: Well, it is because I think you mean get out of a hole rather than a box, right? Because usually when you say somebody is in a box, you mean -- it's like Saddam Hussein used to be in a box.
MR. BOUCHER: Look, these guys are in a box in a hole.
(Laughter.)
And heres the issue.
They have affronted the entire international community by, first of all, having a side deal -- a side program to develop enriched uranium; second of all, by more and more declaring that they intend to develop nuclear weapons and the other day coming up with a fairly specious argument that somehow if they only had nuclear weapons, they could have more money and a smaller military.
But in any case, what theyre doing is building themselves a box by every time somebody in the outside world tries to help them out whether its with the prospect of better relations, or ongoing relationships, they seem to throw up a wall directly.
And you get enough walls around you; youre in a box to mix up my metaphors even more.
The fact is you have the Chinese, the Russians, everybody else saying, we want a denuclearized peninsula, at the same as the North Koreans say, "Oh, we want a nuclear weapon."
And that is what I would say, is putting yourself in a box.
QUESTION: Okay, quickly, the usual way diplomats help people get out of boxes is by finding sort of face-saving formulae.
Is that the kind of thing youre looking at?
MR. BOUCHER: No.
Were finding a way for them to end their nuclear programs.
At this point I dont have anything new on that.
Weve made very, very clear they need to irreversibly and verifiably end their nuclear programs on the peninsula and we think that is the approach that others have taken, as well, in calling for a denuclearized peninsula.
June 10, 2003 Deputy Secretary of State Richard L. Armitage Interview with CNN, Tokyo Bureau Chief Rebecca McKinnon U.S. Embassy Tokyo
QUESTION: ...
North Korea has come out with a new statement this week saying that it needs nuclear weapons as a deterrent against what it perceives as a nuclear threat from the United States.
Does this new statement raise the stakes; make a solution more urgent?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: I think that the solution is urgent enough without this statement.
I think that the interpretation by the North Koreans is a very facile one, I would argue that their unrelenting attempt to garner nuclear weapons and sort of WMD capabilities comes at the expense of starving their nation, and I think that should introduce a sense of urgency into their deliberations.
Urgency of another kind, urgency to give up these weapons and join the community of nations in a more benign environment.
QUESTION: Now the talks that went on in Beijing in April between the U.S., North Korea and China didn't get very far.
What do you think of the chances of more talks happening in the next few months, and possibly including South Korea and Japan this time?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: Well, we certainly want to expand the talks to include Japan and South Korea, they have very great equities in the successful outcome of these deliberations and they should have a seat at the table.
Further, I think it's very appropriate that all of us understand at the same time what the views of the North Koreans are, and the North Koreans ought to hear at the same time what the views of her neighbors are.
I'm cautiously optimistic that we'll eventually sit down in a multi-lateral framework, though I can't predict to you exactly when it'll be.
I don't think it'll be in the too distant future.
But I can't predict exactly when.
QUESTION: Are you seeing any signs coming from North Korea regarding their willingness to engage?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: No, I haven't seen anything in recent days.
I see a series of statements and we had a congressional delegation which visited recently and once I return, I'll be studying the records of those talks and we'll see if there is any signal there.
And, we'll look to friends and neighbors in the surrounding area to give us their advice, including of course the Japanese and I'll be discussing these matters with Japanese officials later today.
QUESTION: Are you concerned that South Korea appears less eager to be tough on North Korea than Japan and the United States?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: I think South Korea has a great deal of disappointment that it's evidencing because they engaged in very good faith and so-called engagement or sunshine policy, and received the back of the hand from the North Koreans in return.
So, I think there's a little bit of disappointment tingeing the South Korean response, but I found when President Roh came to visit Mr. Bush in Washington that they had quite a good meeting of the minds, as did Prime Minister Koizumi when he came to Crawford.
And I suspect that, at the end of the day, we'll all hang together on this matter because the equities and the importance of it are so high.
QUESTION: Now, there are growing calls here in Japan for economic sanctions against North Korea and there's discussion of that in Washington as well.
What would precipitate sanctions in your view?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: It is a weapon or is a tool that's out there and this is not something that Washington would engage in alone.
It's something that would have to seek the advice of a lot of friends and also the UN, I think, has a role to play in here.
But it's very difficult I think to successfully sanction a country which is in effect, self sanctioning because of their own policies and their own lack of freedoms for her peoples.
So we have to keep that into consideration, too.
Whatever you do should be effective.
QUESTION: Now critics of the Bush Administration accuse the Bush Administration of having an unfocused North Korea policy, stemming largely from what many people feel is a very open division within the Bush administration about how to handle North Korea -- whether to pursue regime change, whether to pursue more engagement oriented policies.
When you speak about North Korea policy, are you confident you're speaking for the entire Bush Administration?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: I'm quite confident.
We have one leader in Washington.
The name of that gentleman is George W. Bush.
He has set the policy.
He has publicly announced it both in Crawford and again when President Roh was in Washington.
He seeks a peaceful, diplomatic solution in a multilateral setting, and that is the policy.
I think American citizens should be quite happy that there is a robust discussion of all issues, whether it's North Korean policy or any other, and that we have a President who can be decisive, and will be decisive, and welcomes strong views among his advisors in order to illuminate all sides of an issue for him.
QUESTION: But isn't that going to become very difficult to get a deal with the North Koreans, given that in 1994, the deal that was made then fell apart because of non-compliance.
What kind of shape do you envision a deal would need to take in order to work?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: Well, clearly it has to be completely verifiable.
This is what was missing in 1994.
And, the burden of the proof of any agreement is going to lie on the backs of North Koreans, not on others of us.
And, you're absolutely right.
Of course, it will be difficult.
It's made more difficult by the history that they've introduced.
The history of non-compliance; the history of cheating on these agreements.
Even at a time when they had an administration that was as favorably exposed to them as anyone could imagine, with a Secretary of State who had traveled to Pyongyang.
QUESTION: Is there a carrot along with the stick for them?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: The so-called bold approach that Mr. Kelly laid out when he went to Pyongyang is a bit of a carrot, if North Korea were to eschew verifiably that weapons of mass destruction and eliminate their missile proliferation and other items, and clearly the United States would be willing to assist them, so should the international community; their neighbors in South Korea, their fellow countrymen in South Korea, their neighbors in Japan.
So there is a bold approach out there and I'm thinking there'd be plenty of assistance for North Korea, but she's got to take the first step.
She caused the problem; she's got to re-mediate the problem and then we can move on.
QUESTION: Finally, the U.S. has announced plans to reorganize its troop presence in South Korea and there are also reports about possible reorganization of some of the Marines in Okinawa, in conjunction--
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: I believe those reports have been denied by my colleague, Paul Wolfowitz -- the latter statement.
QUESTION: Right.
But this is all in the context of discussion about a restructuring of U.S. forces in Asia in general, changing the focus from larger fixed bases to smaller, more mobile forces, this kind of thing.
What kind of message do you think is being sent to Asian allies in terms of U.S. commitment to defend people here?
DEPUTY SECRETARY ARMITAGE: First of all, I don't want to be in a position of correcting your comments, but as I understand it, the United States Defense department is looking at the whole situation of global basing of our forces and we want to be sure that our basing worldwide is such that it gives us the greatest degree of flexibility and the greatest bang for the buck.
Here in Asia, there have been some discussions with our friends in the Republic of Korea, and anything that happens here in Asia is going to be one that allows the United States to better effect our security cooperation and our alliance responsibilities, or else we won't change.
Further, any of these changes are going to be things that are subject to enormous discussions with host governments and most notable of which is our most important ally in Asia, Japan.
June 12, 2003 Secretary of State Colin Powell Interview by The Associated Press
QUESTION: North Korea, they seem to be -- well, they are -- more open about their intentions, and the U.S. has meetings with them.
We were told there wasn't -- there was a report of a recent meeting -- evidently, it isn't so.
But are you getting more alarmed about this? And I know what you want.
You want multilateral talks with them.
But what are we doing lately to try to stop this menacing situation?
SECRETARY POWELL: These are the same claims they have been making.
They change their claim a little bit with each passing day.
Some days they say they have reprocessed all of the rods; other days they say they are on the way to doing it; some days they say they have nuclear weapons; other days they say they are developing them.
We accept them at their word, as they gave that word to us, to Assistant Secretary Kelly in Beijing not too long ago, that they have nuclear weapons.
And by so admitting it, if they do have nuclear weapons, they now bring down the disdain of the entire international community and all of their neighbors.
And so they may enjoy the prospect of being a nuclear holding nation but it is not going to do them any good.
We will not be frightened into taking actions that we believe are inappropriate.
And I think the North Koreans should be taking a look around and noticing that the Japanese are stiffening their positions with respect to North Korea.
The South Korean, the Chinese, the Japanese, the Australians, the United States, Russia, all of us are saying the same thing.
We do not want nuclear weapons on the Korean Peninsula and North Korea has not found a friend or anybody willing to support its position.
And so, we will continue to communicate to the world that the United States seeks a diplomatic solution, a political solution, and we feel confident one can be found.
But it has to be found in a multilateral forum with the principal neighbors of North Korea and the United States participating in that forum, not for the purpose of ganging up on North Korea, but for the purpose of bringing everybody into the room who has an equity in this problem.
North Korea's nukes are more of a direct threat to Japan, South Korea, China, Russia and neighbors in the region than they are to the United States of America, and all of us demand that this problem be solved.
I believe it can be solved in a peaceful way.
They changed their argument in recent days to say that another reason for having a nuclear deterrent is, one, to deter us; but, two, as a way of cutting their conventional forces and saving money.
Well, that is an interesting new argument, and I hope they do cut their forces because that is also a very destabilizing factor.
June 10, 2003 Deputy Secretary of State Richard Armitage Remarks to the Press following his meeting with Chief Cabinet Secretary Fukuda Prime Minister's Official Residence, Tokyo, Japan
QUESTION: Regarding North Korea, what is your prospect for five nation multilateral talks?
ARMITAGE: Well, I think the prospects are fair for eventual multilateral talks, to include expanding the talks to have South Korea and Japan.
I think those countries, which have the most equities involved, should rightfully sit at the table and be able to listen to the North Korean views, and also put our views on the table to the North Koreans.
So I think eventually we'll have those talks.
QUESTION: Did you set any timeframe for involving Japan and South Korea?
ARMITAGE: No, and we do not talk about a timeframe....
June 9, 2003 Deputy Secretary of State Richard Armitage Press Roundtable American Embassy Tokyo, Japan
QUESTION: ...
I'd like to ask about U.S. policy toward North Korea.
I think that last week, Mr. Koizumi and Mr. Roh met, and they made a statement, and they said that they reconfirmed principles stated in the summit meetings with President Bush, with both heads of governments.
So, first of all, could you tell me what kinds of measures do you think might be taken if North Korea escalates the situation further?
ARMITAGE: I think you're asking probably the same questions you asked Mike Green at lunch today, and it's silly to ask hypothetical questions, I think, because I don't know what the action is, so I don't know what the reaction will be.
I think the important thing is that the United States, Japan, Republic of Korea, China, and I might add Russia, stay very closely aligned on this matter, and make sure that we coordinate our response.
It's quite clear that no one wants the situation to escalate among those five I just named.
and we have to do our best to keep the situation from escalating.
That's why the reaffirmation by the two, Prime Minister Koizumi and President Roh here in Tokyo, of the principles that they discussed with President Bush, both at Crawford and in Washington, is a very important factor.
As you would know from discussions with other officials, we put a lot of emphasis on multilateral diplomacy, and the reason is we found that bilaterally the North Koreans play us off.
It's much better to let the North Koreans be seen, by all the major countries who are concerned, for just what they are.
But I'm not going to get into any specifics of what we'll do if they escalate.
We'll discuss it at the time....
QUESTION: ...
Also about North Korea, they cancelled their visit that was planned for today, because of what they called a massive security clampdown by Japanese authorities.
Mr. Secretary, do you support what the Japanese government has been doing with regards to that ship's (Man Gyong Bong's) visit, what they plan to do in order to stop the possible smuggling of missile parts and other things?
ARMITAGE: I absolutely support the activities of the government of Japan, and I would note, I'd find it very difficult to understand how any Japanese citizen couldn't support the activities, particularly after you've all seen the mystery ship, and you could go down and look at it today! Absolutely, I support it....
QUESTION: There remains still ambiguity about the agreement of the three countries.
Actually, Koizumi and Bush agree totally that tougher measures are needed ...
Roh seems to be unwilling to actively endorse that.
Do you have a word or two on that?
ARMITAGE: I know from my own discussions with President Roh, and I've read discussions here in Tokyo, that it seems to me that all three - South Korea, the United States and Japan - agree on the need for pressure and dialogue.
Perhaps the difference with President Roh has to do with emphasis.
Clearly, he is the one with the biggest equity exposed immediately, therefore, he might put more emphasis on dialogue.
But clearly, what we've all done in the past has not worked with North Korea, notwithstanding how much assistance South Korea has provided or the United States or Japan, or money, or international agreements - the North Koreans have violated them.
Clearly, we have to change what we are doing, so in our view we need some pressure to go along with the dialogue.
But I don't sense a major difference of opinion.
I think it's a difference of emphasis, and probably the difference of emphasis comes from the different geographic locations of our three countries....
QUESTION: ...
My question is to follow up what Mr. Suzuki asked about the Man Gyong Bong, the North Korean ship that decided not to come.
The Japanese government authorities did not hide their intention to be tough when the ship comes.
For example, the Japanese authorities wanted to do a thorough inspection after the ship reached a Japanese port, and consequently they decided not to come.
But do you think that was a good result of a good policy? Would it have been better to let the ship come and do the information gathering or intelligence gathering and make it useful?
ARMITAGE: You're asking questions the answers to which one can't know.
The policy of the government of Japan, and in this case on this ferry, was developed only by the government of Japan.
I was asked if I support it, and I said absolutely.
I think if you look at what's going on recently, our friends in Australia found a boat which was smuggling not only arms but drugs, and more recently the South Koreans found I think it was 50 kilos of meth amphetamines on a ship that was coming out of a North Korean port.
You had your own experience with the mystery ship, which I referred to earlier.
You've had your own terrible tragedy of the abductees.
So I think there are any number of reasons for Japanese authorities to be very suspicious and to be very cautious....
QUESTION: Let's change the subject to the U.S. military presence in Asia.
It is reported that the Bush Administration has started to study the redeployment of the military presence in Asia, particularly in view of the threat from North Korea.
How are you going to redeploy, if so?
ARMITAGE: Thank you.
The redeployment is a worldwide study.
In the past, we have more or less adopted a regional approach to things.
But we've found, with the global war on terrorism, because of the nature of trans-national activities, that, for instance, forces in Europe may actually be used in the Middle East or Southeast Asia, and vice versa.
Asian forces might be used in other theaters.
It's the nature of this global war on terrorism.
So in truth, it is not an Asian re-look.
It's a global re-look, first of all.
Second of all, we may have some relocations or changes.
We're having discussions, as you saw in the press, with our Korean friends about relocating some of the forces to areas that are not so far north near the DMZ.
We need to get out of the areas that are so crowded.
When we first went to Korea there was nothing north of Seoul, and when General Powell served there, when I traveled there first in 1967, it was all country from Seoul to the DMZ.
Now it's all city.
Our bases are hemmed in, closed in.
We can do nothing.
So we need to remove those, with the permission and with the willing accomplice of the South Korean government, to areas which are not so crowded, in which they can breathe a little bit.
None of that is going to be done without the full agreement of the South Korean government, and none of it's going to be done, anyway, without the full understanding of the government of Japan.
But we've just started those discussions.
A man well known to you, Mr. Chris LaFleur, is the State Department representative at those discussions, and I think he may even be around Tokyo today or tomorrow, so you can have these conversations.
But what he'll tell you is that we're in the beginning of a process, all of which will be totally exposed to our friends in Japan.
There's nothing mysterious about it.
There's nothing frightening about it.
At the end of the day - and I'm talking about a process that takes years; it doesn't take months - we'll be, the United States, in a better posture to fulfill all of our duties under our various security treaties, not the least of which is the U.S.-Japan Security Treaty.
QUESTION: I'm Ichinose with NHK.
Thank you very much.
I have a question on North Korea, and the question is whether we have... whether time is on our side or on their side, because while we are trying to put multi-national pressure on, North Korea is apparently going nuclear.
How much time do we still have, and how are you going to stop this? What is your timeframe for your negotiations, or any kind of actions you might consider?
ARMITAGE: Well, let's be clear: the Koreans admitted to us that they had nuclear capability.
We've been saying publicly that they had at least one or two weapons for about two years now, maybe a little more.
So there's nothing particularly surprising in that.
We don't have a timeframe in mind.
We have begun discussions with friends about having better multilateral mechanisms with which to stop proliferation.
We think we've been somewhat successful in lowering the appetite of some countries for technology etc. from North Korea.
We do have certain intelligence capabilities, and I might note that when we stopped, last December, that vessel off Yemen carrying the Scud missiles, it was a very good signal to North Korea.
The signal was: We can see you, we know what you're doing, and we can reach out any time and touch you.
So there are lots of ways to tighten up on this, and we're not in a big hurry.
There are other activities going on.
I've read in your newspapers that the remittances from the Chosen Soren have gone down a lot, which must get the attention of the North Korean authorities.
So eventually they can either play ball with the international community and have a bright and happy future, or they can continue down the path they're on, with unpredictable consequences.
QUESTION: (Kato, Asahi Shimbun) Sir, following up about North Korea: What makes you think that North Korea will eventually give up nuclear weapons? If they do, they will just be one poor miserable country, which they would never like to be, so what's the roadmap here?
ARMITAGE: Aren't they already a poor, miserable country? Isn't that the burden of what we've heard from defectors? Isn't that what you've heard from the abductees? So they are already a poor country.
Now, they're a poor country with nuclear weapons, so go on.
QUESTION: So what's the roadmap? We hear a lot about a roadmap in the Middle East, from the United States, but we don't hear about a roadmap for North Korea.
ARMITAGE: As you know, my colleague, Mr. Kelly, laid before them a rather bold proposal that let them use their two paths.
They can continue the path they're on, which is not a good one for the people or the nation of North Korea, or they could choose the path of giving up those weapons systems and bettering the lives of their people and having international assistance, and we made it very clear we'll do our part in that matter.
This is a choice that Kim Jong Il and his colleagues are going to have to come to.
So I think there's your roadmap.
If it's anything, it's a fork in the road, and when you come to a fork in the road you have to take one or the other, so we'll see which they take.
I think they're trying to decide.
QUESTION: Again on North Korea, recently we got some reports that North Korea is weakening its opposition against multilateral talks, and the question is, when do you expect that multilateral talks will occur, including Japan and South Korea?
ARMITAGE: As you correctly point out, our desire is to have the formerly trilateral talks expanded to include Japan and South Korea, because of the equities both of your nations have, and I can't predict the timetable.
We're ready for another series of multilateral talks.
We look forward to getting a view from the North Koreans if they're ready.
I can't tell you the date because we don't have a date.
In the meantime, we'll continue our activities.
We've got a TCOG coming up in Hawaii soon, where the United States, Japan and South Korea will make sure we consolidate and coordinate our own actions, and we'll wait to see when the North Koreans have something to say.
In this regard, let me point out that it is our view, and I think it's the view of the government of Japan, that China has been absolutely first-rate in seeking a peaceful solution to this question and realizing that China, too, could be vitally affected by the way this comes out.
So I want to salute the activities of the People's Republic of China....
QUESTION: The first one is, President Bush disclosed a new idea of a counter-proliferation regime after his visit to Europe.
If you could elaborate on it, including so-called ship inspection, naval blockade, confiscation of goods and so on, part of it you already have done in the case of North Korea.
How much of it is related to the role of Japan? That's the first question.
What are your goals for tomorrow's strategic dialogue with Takeuchi-san?
ARMITAGE: On the first question, President Bush in Poland made some comments about counter-proliferation regime and ideas that we have, and that we wanted to seek the ideas and views of some of our major partners, of course including Japan.
It's not only devoted to North Korea - that's the immediate situation that we face here in Northeast Asia.
It's more a recognition that we have some very good international regimes and non-proliferation, counter-proliferation agreements, that they in themselves aren't sufficient, particularly when it comes to dealing with transnational actors or states dealing with transnational actors.
So we're seeking in the first incident the ideas of all of our friends, and how best to strengthen this up.
We've had some ideas, but we're not the only ones with ideas, and we haven't even settled in our own mind on what's right.
Some of it is, as I referred to in an earlier question, the use of intelligence to identify shipments and to inform people along the way.
We can stop and board ships if we have reasons.
We can narrow the number of ports that ships are allowed into so as to be able to inspect more regularly and more easily.
We can provide intelligence in a more quick and efficient way in these matters if we're sure of the protection of that intelligence.
There may also be, in the minds of some, and we welcome any ideas, an entire international regime with UN sanction that could be brought to the fore.
We don't have all the answers, so we're seeking them.
On the question of tomorrow's meeting with Vice Foreign Minister Takeuchi and his colleagues, I believe, following Crawford, that we've reached a new level of understanding with our friends in Japan.
Many of you know that I'm personally very gratified, because of the so-called Armitage Report, that almost all of the tenets in that report have been realized.
I'm going to continue to do the absolute best I can for the American side, and hopefully our Japanese friends will want it, to assure that, to the extent it's comfortable in Japan, that they are treated just the way that we work with Great Britain - that we share information with them just the way we do with Great Britain, that we talk about our problems with Japan just like we do with Great Britain, and that we constantly ask for interaction so we can discuss the great issues of the day quietly and privately, so that we're not surprised when things happen.
Our governments have a starting point before an issue comes to the fore.
That's what I'm going to try to accomplish, and I'm quite sure that I'll find Mr. Takeuchi and his colleagues wanting to reciprocate.
I don't think we needed so much the Bush-Koizumi at Crawford meeting, because we already had a pretty good relationship.
But I think the signal that was sent there, and indeed the signal of sitting down, having the President of the United States sit down with the Prime Minister of Japan and the Deputy Chief Cabinet Secretary and share his morning intelligence brief, said more about our relationship than any number of strategic dialogue meetings that we could hold....
QUESTION: Are you also expecting that the three countries will reach some kind of agreement on specific tougher measures they're willing to take?
ARMITAGE: Well, I think that the members there at the TCOG would not be able themselves to reach those decisions.
Those are national decisions that would have to be carried back to the leadership, in this case of Japan or South Korea.
But they'll certainly discuss the full range of issues, and then we'll see where we are.
But TCOG is important to us because it allows us to sort of expose issues to everyone so there are no surprises and things of that nature.
But beyond that I'm not going to predict what will come out.
Whatever, decisions will have to be referred back to capitols.
They're not going to make them in Honolulu.
QUESTION: You said that the North Koreans are shown two paths.
ARMITAGE: Yes, a path in and a path out.
A fork in the road.
QUESTION: Are you personally optimistic the North Koreans will be persuaded to take the good path? It seems quite likely they're going to choose the bad path, and they'll face the unpredicted consequences.
ARMITAGE: Well, I think my crystal ball looking into the future is just as muddy as yours is, and I ...
Ina-san has just described me as a realist, and if that's the case, I'll be realistic and say that it's tough, it's tough to imagine that they will all of a sudden turn over a new leaf.
But it's not impossible, and you can't do what our President wants, that is, to really try to seek to find a diplomatic and peaceful solution, if in the back of your mind you're always thinking about going to war.
That's why we always say we do seek a diplomatic and peaceful solution, and we have no intention of invading North Korea.
We say this over and over again in the hopes that they'll understand it.
At the same time, we don't take any options off the table.
That would be silly.
But I would not describe myself as anything other than realistic about the difficulties of the issue.
Not optimistic or pessimistic....
QUESTION: There was some criticism of U.S. policy on North Korea, saying that the focus of U.S. policy for North Korea is on proliferation of nuclear weapons or proliferation of missile technology.
Some say that the U.S. government should put much more focus on making them give up weapons themselves.
Could you comment on that?
ARMITAGE: Well, in truth, when Mr. Kelly went to North Korea he raised several concerns.
It wasn't just a matter of proliferation.
It was a matter of possession of weapons of mass destruction.
It was missile development.
It was forward deployed conventional forces that are very heavily forward deployed conventional forces.
And human rights in North Korea.
So his agenda was for ... all of which are concerns to all nations who ...
Then the question that you raise about proliferation.
In the first instance, they've already said they have nuclear weapons.
We do want to roll that back.
But more than that, we have to stop proliferation.
We've got to keep the hard currency that North Korea could earn from the hands of Kim Jong Il by preventing proliferation.
If you are able to do that, then maybe you can get them to realize that the better path for them, on this fork in the road, is one that leads to more international respectability and acceptance.
And, by the way, access to assistance, as a way to go forward in the future.
We have a saying, it's kind of irreligious, but we say there's only one way to eat an elephant.
Do you know how you eat an elephant? You eat it one bite at a time.
(laughter) I think in the North Korean situation, you have to eat it one bite at a time.
So if you stop the proliferation, you cut down on the hard currency.
If you cut down on the hard currency, you restrict the freedom of movement of the regime, and maybe they'll start thinking about having the other path, the better path....
June 3, 2003 Deputy Secretary of Defense Paul Wolfowitz Media availability at the U.S. Embassy in Tokyo
Q: Howard French from the New York Times.
You've just been in Seoul and over the last couple of weeks; the South Korean Government has expressed the desire that any change in the Second Infantry Division await a resolution of the North Korean nuclear problem.
I wonder if you have been able to work that question of timing out to the satisfaction of both sides.
And I also noted in press reports about your visit to South Korea, that there was talk which seemed to come from unnamed members of your delegation about potential war plans that could involve going after the North Korean leadership in Pyongyang or somewhere inside North Korea, as opposed to focusing on fighting around the DMZ.
Are there any such plans? Have things developed to that degree, and have North Korean war fighting plans been inspired or refined in light of the Iraq war experience?
Wolfowitz: We don't discuss military plans, for good operational reasons.
I can assure you that I didn't see these press reports but, if they are as you describe them, they certainly didn't come from me or anybody in my party.
Let me say importantly what we're talking about, in terms of the future of the alliance study that we're undertaking with our Korean allies, is how best to enhance and shape and align our forces and the forces of our Korean allies to most effectively provide for deterrence of a North Korean attack and the defense of Korea should an attack come.
It's not something that should wait until the nuclear problem is solved, as though somehow it's going to weaken our posture.
To the contrary, it's part of an effort to strengthen our overall posture in the peninsula including, as General LaPorte announced last week, a very substantial investment by the United States in some 150 systems that will enhance our ability to provide for early defense against a North Korean attack.
In shortest terms, I would say the North Koreans have certain advantages over us -- asymmetric advantages -- which they continue to press.
We have some considerable advantages as well; particularly advantages that accrue from the kinds of remarkable military capabilities that the world has just seen demonstrated in Afghanistan and Iraq.
We think that it's very important that we update our force posture from where it was ten years ago, to take advantage of those capabilities so that we can counter a North Korean attack more quickly and more effectively, so we can strengthen deterrence.
That's what it's about.
The issue of timing, I think, should relate to when our two countries have adequately consulted about the changes, have come to a reasonable level of mutual agreement about the changes, and importantly have educated both of our publics about what it's all about.
My visit there was part of trying to begin that process of public education, and I think that we have active partners in our allies in Korea doing that.
June 3, 2003 Deputy Secretary of Defense Paul Wolfowitz Town hall meeting with U.S. troops at Camp Greaves, Republic of Korea.
Q: Good afternoon, sir, I'm Senior Airman Shaun Curzalack.
I'm from Cooperstown, New York.
My question is how do you see air power in the event of a war here in Korea?
Wolfowitz: In Korea? I think it's one of our great advantages and I think the North Koreans know it and I think it's what keeps their heads down.
But it works in ways it didn't work before -- much, much more effective because it's not only that with long range air power we can attack targets deep in the enemy rear, but we have the ability now and that's where jointness really makes a difference.
To bring air power and ground forces together with an effectiveness that is simply stunning.
In fact, one of the things we'd like to urge our South Korean colleagues to do is to have more of that capability in their own forces.
You saw it in Afghanistan, where literally a handful of American soldiers riding horseback were able to bring air power to bear on an enemy and change the course of a whole war and similarly we saw that applied in Iraq and I think the North Koreans understand that and it would be one of our big advantages.
But not air power by itself.
It's air power integrated as part of a joint team.
June 3, 2003 Deputy Secretary of Defense Paul Wolfowitz Remarks following a meeting with Japanese Deputy Chief Cabinet Secretary Shinzo Abe Prime Minister's Residence, Tokyo, Japan.
Q: In the recent conversation between Koizumi and Mr. Bush, they talked about the pressure on North Korea.
Did you talk about any concrete measures?
Wolfowitz: Not concrete measures, but I think the principle has got to be, as I said, dialogue and pressure.
If North Korea will change its course -- the course it's on is a blind alley -- if it will change its course and become a reasonable, normal member of the international community in this part of the world, North Korea could benefit enormously, and its people would benefit enormously.
June 3, 2003 Deputy Secretary of Defense Paul Wolfowitz and U.S. Ambassador to Japan Howard H. Baker, Jr.
Coffee with Traveling Press Ambassador's Residence, Tokyo, Japan
QUESTION: I wanted to ask about the non-proliferation initiative in Evian and how you foresee--first of all, whether it was announced as a global initiative in order to avoid the perception that it would be only focused on North Korea or on Asia--and just generally how you see that playing out in the Asian context.
DEPUTY SECRETARY WOLFOWITZ: Well, my understanding is that it was done as a global thing because it is a matter of global concern.
Our concerns about proliferation of this technology are not just limited to North Korea.
In fact, one of the very striking and disturbing things that we observed when I was a member of the so-called Ballistic Missile Threat Commission, better known as the Rumsfeld Commission, five years ago--which had a bipartisan group of widely divergent views about missile defense--we came to some remarkable consensus about the nature of the threat that was developing.
What surprised even me--and I was not easily surprised on this issue--was the amount of trade in dangerous technologies and dangerous systems taking place among the worst proliferators.
It was almost as though the rules of the game had changed.
It used to be that once a country joined the nuclear club, they decided that the club was just about the right size and they didn't want any new members.
Unfortunately, that's not the case anymore, so you get countries like North Korea helping Pakistan.
The list goes on--I don't want to get into classified areas here, but it's a serious problem not just limited to North Korea, and I think having a stronger international legal basis for dealing with it would be a contributor worldwide, as well as in East Asia.
QUESTION: But in terms of North Korea, how do you expect this to fit into the overall U.S. strategy and the fact that U.S. officials have been talking about the need to try to crack down more on the sources of cash currency for Pyongyang?
DEPUTY SECRETARY WOLFOWITZ: I think it's less a matter of cracking down on the sources of currency, although that would be a byproduct from trying to do everything you can to make sure that these dangerous technologies aren't exported, and to give a basis for countries that want to help stop it, to give them more of a legal basis to do so, and for those countries that may be reluctant to stop it, to give us more of a basis to lean on them to prevent it.
It's the danger involved in this that is our primary concern....
QUESTION: Gentlemen, I have a question for both of you, real quick.
Mr. Wolfowitz, you mentioned the other day--it might have been in Seoul--you mentioned that the North Koreans are gaining an advantage, a growing advantage in asymmetrical warfare.
I assume you're talking about perhaps missiles, chem-bio, something they could possibly use.
How would this apply to Japan? What is Japan most concerned about North Korea? Is it the missile technology? Could you comment about that, Mr. Baker? Because Japan is obviously very concerned.
DEPUTY SECRETARY WOLFOWITZ: Let me just correct that.
I didn't say anything about whether their asymmetrical advantages were growing or declining.
I said they have certain asymmetrical advantages, including the fact of this huge concentration of artillery just north of the demilitarized zone.
That's one of their advantages.
We have advantages of ours, and what I was talking about was that instead of playing into their strengths, we need to play into our strengths and play against their weaknesses.
QUESTION: I just thought artillery was more traditional ...
DEPUTY SECRETARY WOLFOWITZ: It goes all the way up.
Obviously they are trying, with their missile development, to find an area of weakness for us, and I think it's one of the reasons why missile defense makes sense, but I'd much rather have our asymmetrical advantages than theirs, if I had to trade.
QUESTION: Thanks, sir.
And Mr. Baker, about Japan's concerns?
AMBASSADOR BAKER: Well, first of all, Japan is aware of the fact that it lives in a very dangerous neighborhood, and that it must take account of that for its own survival and defense.
There are a variety of things that presently contributes to their anxiety and concern about stability in the region, and one of them of course is the apparent development of a nuclear capability in North Korea.
But you can add to that as well the over-flight of this island by test shots--what appear to be test shots--by their missiles.
You can add to that the persistence of the North Koreans to abduct Japanese citizens and keep them and refuse to release many of them, and their families.
You can add to that the sarin gas attack, which is the most recent significant gas warfare anyplace--that was not so long ago--and add to that the fact that Japan understands that it's a rich nation that lives in a dangerous neighborhood.
So you put all that together and it heightens their sense of responsibility to provide for their own defense and to depend--as they do--on the United States alliance and friendship to provide protection as well.
I think that coordination between Japan and the United States on defense matters has been extraordinary, and it continues to be.
There are big opportunities in the future for both countries to elaborate that still further.
The best way to put it is that I think both Japan and the United States have a rational and reasonable expectation that they will be able to contain the threats that are launched against them, but also a reasonable expectation that they must do very important things to prepare for it.
We are interdependent, but America also must realize and does realize that Japan, while being interdependent is also a great sovereign nation that deserves a chair on the stage in the disposition of world issues....
QUESTION: Mr. Ambassador, I have a question about missile defense cooperation.
The Japanese government is now considering the purchase of a naval-based air missile system, which could be mounted on an Aegis destroyer, and also the purchase of the new PAC-3 missile system.
Do you expect the Japanese to move to the development level or the deployment level?
AMBASSADOR BAKER: Do I expect them to go forward with the acquisition and deployment of these systems?
QUESTION: Yes.
AMBASSADOR BAKER: That's of course very much up to Japanese Maritime Self Defense Forces and the self-defense establishment in Japan.
What they decide to do is Japan's decision.
You asked me what I felt, what I would wish for.
I would wish that on missile defense, whether sea-born or land-based, that Japan would bring to bear its extraordinary technical confidence and its resources to participate in the development of an effective missile defense system.
I think it's a unique opportunity for Japan to do something uniquely suited to its talents, abilities and structure.
On missile defense in general, I think it is useful to remind ourselves that the world has changed.
While artillery tubes can be destructive, for instance by North Korea to Seoul, they are not likely to cause any great danger to Japan.
But long-range and medium-range missiles from North Korea are likely to do that, so Japan I'm sure will configure its defense arrangements so it takes account of the threat today, not the threat in the past.
That, too, argues in favor of Japanese innovation on new systems, Japanese cooperation with the United States on new systems, and the deployment of systems to be operated, perhaps in conjunction with its friends and allies, including the United States.
June 2, 2003 Deputy Secretary of Defense Paul Wolfowitz At the Korea Chamber of Commerce and Industry in Seoul
As we discuss in Korea how best to transform both our forces, U.S. and Korean, to ensure the continuing effectiveness of our alliance, we are guided by two principal considerations.
First, deterrence remains a key objective of our common defense posture.
To strengthen deterrence, we need to take advantage of new technology to counter North Korean asymmetric advantages.
Second, the changes we make should help to sustain a strong alliance over the long run, by reducing unnecessary burdens on both sides and ensuring that the alliance will remain relevant far into the future.
As our discussions progress here in Korea in the coming weeks and months, and as we work out the details of our new force structure for both our countries, we will be making firm commitments to incorporate these new capabilities promptly and as they become available here in Korea.
In fact, as General LaPorte explained publicly last week, the U.S. plans to enhance more than 150 capabilities, representing a substantial investment over the next four years in the ROK-U.S. alliance.
As this process unfolds, we are confident that Korea will make comparable and complementary investments to improve its own capabilities.
I might note, in this regard, Im impressed at the statistic that says Korea is the most wired country in the world.
Wed like to see your military become the most wired military in the world.
June 1, 2003 A Senior Administration Official Background briefing for the press on President Bush's meeting with Chinese President Hu at the G-8 Summit International Filing Center Evian-les-Bains, France
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: As you would all expect, the two discussed the situation in North Korea.
This was, in effect, the President's third in a round of consultations with the key countries on the North Korea issue.
As you remember, he met with President Roh the second week of May in Washington.
He then met with Prime Minister Koizumi at Crawford last week.
And now he has met with President Hu.
President Bush reiterated his strong desire for a peaceful diplomatic resolution of this issue, working with the concerned countries, including not only China, but of course, our good Northeast Asia allies, Japan and South Korea.
He also specifically thanked China for hosting the trilateral talks in Beijing in April, and he underscored that we continue to believe that China's cooperation will play a key role in the peaceful resolution of this issue....
Q: Two things on North Korea and the discussion.
First, the Chinese have indicated in recent days that they thought it was perfectly good to just get the same group together again, China, North Korea, the U.S. -- well, of course the U.S. is trying to get South Korea and Japan into it.
They did discuss the configuration of the talks, the timing of the talks? And secondly, was there any discussion of what role China would play, if any, in any ultimate economic sanctions on North Korea?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: The conversation did not go as far as economic sanctions.
There was a little bit of back and forth on the question of possible formats.
As I said, we ended with both sides agreeing that we have to work together on this, and with the -- both sides also acknowledging that the Japanese and South Koreans have a key role to play.
Q: Can you tell us a little more about this back-and-forth?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Back-and-forth.
Basically, the Chinese did tell us that the North Koreans are pushing for a bilateral conversation.
They acknowledge that that is not only not likely, but also not productive.
They did hope that in a multilateral format we would exchange views with the North Koreans.
Q: How much pressure did the President put on the Chinese in general to just take a more aggressive stand with North Korea? You didn't get specifically the sanctions.
Did you at least discuss the overall approach and the need to turn up the heat? And how did the Chinese react if you did talk about it?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Well, the push was that we cannot let this drift too long.
The question, though, is how do we address that effectively.
The Chinese made it clear that they think it's urgent to get North Korea back to the table, and we agree with that.
We've got to look at how we deal with the North Koreans.
We have to finish our -- we have finished our consultations, initially.
Now we have to go back to our Japanese and South Korean allies and talk about the way forward.
Again, the emphasis was, as I said, we've got to resolve this diplomatically, peacefully, but from our perspective, of course, there has to be a little bit of encouragement to get the North Koreans back to the table.
Q: When you said the Chinese said that it's unlikely and not productive to have a bilateral meeting, have they said that to the North Koreans, as well?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: What they say to the North Koreans is, look, you're going to have to find a way to meet; you cannot just hold out and say you're only going to meet in a bilateral setting.
There is a little bit of to-and-fro here on this issue.
I mean, the North Koreans are digging in, saying that they want bilateral talks.
The Chinese are saying, look, that's not going to happen.
What can we do? Can you express your concerns to the Americans in a multilateral format....
Q: Did the issue of how much influence China actually has over North Korea come up? In the past, the Chinese have suggested that they don't have as much influence as they might have had in the past.
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: The President believes and continues to say to the Chinese that we think you have a lot of influence over North Korea and probably in many ways more than the U.S. has.
He said that again today, and President Hu did not respond one way or the other.
Q: You said it was critical -- that China and the U.S. agreed that it was critical to get the parties back to the table as soon as possible.
There's a Japanese paper reporting today that there may be a meeting in Kuala Lumpur at the end of the month.
Is there any talk of a meeting as soon as this month?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: No, because we haven't really finished yet.
I mean, like I said earlier, we've done a preliminary round of consultations at the presidential level with the three leaders who are concerned.
Now we're going to go back to our Northeast Asian allies and make sure that we agree on a way ahead.
Q: It sounds like the way ahead is, what, another meeting?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Perhaps.
And we haven't come to that conclusion, is what I'm saying.
If you ask me; probably.
But we do have to consult with the South Koreans and Japanese before we move forward.
Q: You said that the Chinese President made clear that the North Koreans do want bilateral discussions.
Did he say that basically anything beyond that at this point is definitely off the table, or did you talk about moving forward and, in fact, perhaps specifically about what meetings -- in the future?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: The President said that he wanted to make clear that our policy is not changing on the question of bilateral talks versus multilateral talks.
We don't think we have enough influence by ourselves to change North Korean behavior.
Therefore, we firmly believe that we need to go in in a group and let the North Koreans know that their nuclear program is not an issue just for the United States, but is an issue for all of the countries in their region.
And he made that very clear to the Chinese.
The Chinese, like I said, were saying, well, can there be some sort of bilateral contact within a multilateral format.
The President said, look, in a multilateral format, sure, the North Koreans can look us in the eyes and say something.
But it's got to be within a multilateral format.
Q: Did the Chinese President ask President Bush if it would be possible for a bilateral --
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: He said -- no, he didn't ask for a bilateral meeting.
The Chinese have given up on that, and the Chinese acknowledge that that probably isn't the most effective way.
Q: -- bilateral --
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Yes, bilateral contacts were the way they were putting it....
Q: Can I clarify two points? You mentioned bilateral contacts.
Can you tell me exactly what you meant by that? Is that what the Chinese said the North Koreans are saying? Or what -- I don't want to blow up the context of that.
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Yes, let me be as clear as I can.
The Chinese said that the North Koreans are saying that there has to be some sort of bilateral contact as the price for a multilateral meeting.
And they were conveying that to us.
Q: And did we have a reaction to that?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: It was just what I just said, that basically the President said there is no change in our stance of we have to have multilateral talks if this is to move forward.
Within those multilateral talks, if the North Koreans look us in the eye on one corner of the table and say things directly to us, we're going to listen, obviously, and we will do the same thing back to them.
Q: So you might do bilateral contacts in order to pave the way for a multilateral --
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: No, no, let me be clear.
It's got to be a multilateral meeting.
We're not going to pull aside.
We're not going to go into a separate room.
We're not going to say, please, North Korea, you come and talk -- spill to us without the Chinese listening in on what's going on here.
Q: One last clarification.
What if anything did he ask of Russia when it comes to the question of North Korea?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: No mention of Russia at all in the North Korea context....
Q: Quick clarification.
Were the Chinese simply conveying this North Korean request, or did they also indicate that they would endorse it or in any way favor the North Korean position?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: They were, in effect, conveying it and asking us to consider it.
That was the word they use.
Q: They asked you to consider it.
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Yes, as a possible way forward.
Q: In your mind, is this a move a change in the North Korean position then? The North Koreans have in the past said it had to be bilateral.
What you heard today was a change in the North Korean position? And similarly, when the President says, sure, in a multilateral format the North Koreans can look us in the eyes, sounds very much like what Secretary Armitage said in Congress that was not so welcome at the White House months ago.
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: In terms of the North Koreans, yes, they've moved -- they have moved a little bit.
They were, as you recall, about two months ago saying that the only type of talks that would be possible would be bilateral talks.
And now they've gone beyond that.
In terms of, is this a change for the President? No, he has said this in the past, that basically it has to be multilateral talks.
And I want you to concentrate on that.
We haven't changed; it has to be multilateral talks.
And all he's saying in response to can there be bilateral contacts, he's asking, well, what does that mean? If it means the North Koreans sitting at a table with two or three or four other parties, look us in the eye and say what's on their mind, if you want to consider that a bilateral contact, then, sure, that will happen.
Q: That's exactly what Rich said in his testimony, and you'll recall people came back and said this could undercut the concept of a multilateral meeting.
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: No, no -- I'm not exactly familiar with what Rich said.
I remember it caused a little bit of a stir at the time.
But I will say that we, all along, have been saying that it's got to be multilateral.
And that's really what I want you concentrating on.
It's not whether we speak first to the Chinese, then to the Japanese or South Koreans if they're there, or maybe even to the North Koreans sitting across the table.
It's the fact that you have to have the parties around a table, and it's not just going to be us talking to the North Koreans.
And I hope we're all clear on that.
Have I made that clear? Okay.
Q: Did they push at all? President Bush said that that was -- bilateral contacts were not acceptable, that multilateral talks had to be the way.
Did he push back at all and try to convince him at all, or just accepted it?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: They accepted it, and I think just the assurance that we'd be willing to listen to North Korean concerns, sitting around a table of four or five other parties -- the Chinese did not push back on that concept.
Q: Did the Chinese leader emphasize peaceful solution of North Korea issues in specific words?
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Did he stress peaceful resolution?
Q: Yes.
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Oh, absolutely, yes.
Both sides did.
I mean, we have that common area where we totally agree that we need a peaceful diplomatic resolution and that we have to be working together.
Q: Could you clarify, was it the Chinese who proposed bilateral contacts within a multilateral format, or the North Koreans who advanced --
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Yes, we're covering the same ground here, I've said that already.
Yes, it was the Chinese conveying the North Korean desire there.
Q: The North Koreans are now, in effect, proposing --
SENIOR ADMINISTRATION OFFICIAL: Yes.
_________________________________________________________________
*Back to the current month for What U.S. Administration Officials Are Saying _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________
This site is produced and maintained by the U.S. Department of State's Bureau of International Information Programs (usinfo.state.gov).
Links to other Internet sites should not be construed as an endorsement of the views contained therein.
Back To Top blue rule IIP Home | Index to This Site | Webmaster | Search This Site | Archives | U.S. Department of State
Sorry, you need a JavaScript capable browser to get the best from this page
